Luganda.aff
FLAG long
PFX EH 0 webaki .
PFX EH 0 webabi .
PFX EH 0 webali .
PFX EH 0 webaga .
PFX EH 0 webaka .
PFX EH 0 webabu .
PFX EH 0 webalu .
PFX EH 0 webaku .
PFX EH 0 webatu .
PFX EH 0 weban [^lmnb]
PFX EH l weband l.[^mn]
PFX EH l webann l.[mn]
PFX EH w webamp w
PFX EH 0 webamu .
PFX EH 0 webaba .
PFX EH 0 webagu .
PFX EH 0 webagi .
PFX EH 0 webazi .
PFX EH 0 webaki .
PFX EH 0 webabi .
PFX EH 0 webali .
PFX EH 0 webaga .
PFX EH 0 webaka .
PFX EH 0 webabu .
PFX EH 0 webalu .
PFX EH 0 webaku .
PFX EH 0 webatu .
PFX EH 0 wegun [^lmnb]
PFX EH l wegund l.[^mn]
PFX EH l wegunn l.[mn]
PFX EH w wegump w
PFX EH 0 wegumu .
PFX EH 0 weguba .
PFX EH 0 wegugu .
PFX EH 0 wegugi .
PFX EH 0 weguzi .
PFX EH 0 weguki .
PFX EH 0 wegubi .
PFX EH 0 weguli .
PFX EH 0 weguga .
PFX EH 0 weguka .
PFX EH 0 wegubu .
PFX EH 0 wegulu .
PFX EH 0 weguku .
PFX EH 0 wegutu .
PFX EH 0 wegin [^lmnb]
PFX EH l wegind l.[^mn]
PFX EH l weginn l.[mn]
PFX EH w wegimp w
PFX EH 0 wegimu .
PFX EH 0 wegiba .
PFX EH 0 wegigu .
PFX EH 0 wegigi .
PFX EH 0 wegizi .
PFX EH 0 wegiki .
PFX EH 0 wegibi .
PFX EH 0 wegili .
PFX EH 0 wegiga .
PFX EH 0 wegika .
PFX EH 0 wegibu .
PFX EH 0 wegilu .
PFX EH 0 wegiku .
PFX EH 0 wegitu .
PFX EH 0 wezin [^lmnb]
PFX EH l wezind l.[^mn]
PFX EH l wezinn l.[mn]
PFX EH w wezimp w
PFX EH 0 wezimu .
PFX EH 0 weziba .
PFX EH 0 wezigu .
PFX EH 0 wezigi .
PFX EH 0 wezizi .
PFX EH 0 weziki .
PFX EH 0 wezibi .
PFX EH 0 wezili .
PFX EH 0 weziga .
PFX EH 0 wezika .
PFX EH 0 wezibu .
PFX EH 0 wezilu .
PFX EH 0 weziku .
PFX EH 0 wezitu .
PFX EH 0 wekin [^lmnb]
PFX EH l wekind l.[^mn]
PFX EH l wekinn l.[mn]
PFX EH w wekimp w
PFX EH 0 wekimu .
PFX EH 0 wekiba .
PFX EH 0 wekigu .
PFX EH 0 wekigi .
PFX EH 0 wekizi .
PFX EH 0 wekiki .
PFX EH 0 wekibi .
PFX EH 0 wekili .
PFX EH 0 wekiga .
PFX EH 0 wekika .
PFX EH 0 wekibu .
PFX EH 0 wekilu .
PFX EH 0 wekiku .
PFX EH 0 wekitu .
PFX EH 0 webin [^lmnb]
PFX EH l webind l.[^mn]
PFX EH l webinn l.[mn]
PFX EH w webimp w
PFX EH 0 webimu .
PFX EH 0 webiba .
PFX EH 0 webigu .
PFX EH 0 webigi .
PFX EH 0 webizi .
PFX EH 0 webiki .
PFX EH 0 webibi .
PFX EH 0 webili .
PFX EH 0 webiga .
PFX EH 0 webika .
PFX EH 0 webibu .
PFX EH 0 webilu .
PFX EH 0 webiku .
PFX EH 0 webitu .
PFX EH 0 welin [^lmnb]
PFX EH l welind l.[^mn]
PFX EH l welinn l.[mn]
PFX EH w welimp w
PFX EH 0 welimu .
PFX EH 0 weliba .
PFX EH 0 weligu .
PFX EH 0 weligi .
PFX EH 0 welizi .
PFX EH 0 weliki .
PFX EH 0 welibi .
PFX EH 0 welili .
PFX EH 0 weliga .
PFX EH 0 welika .
PFX EH 0 welibu .
PFX EH 0 welilu .
PFX EH 0 weliku .
PFX EH 0 welitu .
PFX EH 0 wegan [^lmnb]
PFX EH l wegand l.[^mn]
PFX EH l wegann l.[mn]
PFX EH w wegamp w
PFX EH 0 wegamu .
PFX EH 0 wegaba .
PFX EH 0 wegagu .
PFX EH 0 wegagi .
PFX EH 0 wegazi .
PFX EH 0 wegaki .
PFX EH 0 wegabi .
PFX EH 0 wegali .
PFX EH 0 wegaga .
PFX EH 0 wegaka .
PFX EH 0 wegabu .
PFX EH 0 wegalu .
PFX EH 0 wegaku .
PFX EH 0 wegatu .
PFX EH 0 wekan [^lmnb]
PFX EH l wekand l.[^mn]
PFX EH l wekann l.[mn]
PFX EH w wekamp w
PFX EH 0 wekamu .
PFX EH 0 wekaba .
PFX EH 0 wekagu .
PFX EH 0 wekagi .
PFX EH 0 wekazi .
PFX EH 0 wekaki .
PFX EH 0 wekabi .
PFX EH 0 wekali .
PFX EH 0 wekaga .
PFX EH 0 wekaka .
PFX EH 0 wekabu .
PFX EH 0 wekalu .
PFX EH 0 wekaku .
PFX EH 0 wekatu .
PFX EH 0 webun [^lmnb]
PFX EH l webund l.[^mn]
PFX EH l webunn l.[mn]
PFX EH w webump w
PFX EH 0 webumu .
PFX EH 0 webuba .
PFX EH 0 webugu .
PFX EH 0 webugi .
PFX EH 0 webuzi .
PFX EH 0 webuki .
PFX EH 0 webubi .
PFX EH 0 webuli .
PFX EH 0 webuga .
PFX EH 0 webuka .
PFX EH 0 webubu .
PFX EH 0 webulu .
PFX EH 0 webuku .
PFX EH 0 webutu .
PFX EH 0 welun [^lmnb]
PFX EH l welund l.[^mn]
PFX EH l welunn l.[mn]
PFX EH w welump w
PFX EH 0 welumu .
PFX EH 0 weluba .
PFX EH 0 welugu .
PFX EH 0 welugi .
PFX EH 0 weluzi .
PFX EH 0 weluki .
PFX EH 0 welubi .
PFX EH 0 weluli .
PFX EH 0 weluga .
PFX EH 0 weluka .
PFX EH 0 welubu .
PFX EH 0 welulu .
PFX EH 0 weluku .
PFX EH 0 welutu .
PFX EH 0 wekun [^lmnb]
PFX EH l wekund l.[^mn]
PFX EH l wekunn l.[mn]
PFX EH w wekump w
PFX EH 0 wekumu .
PFX EH 0 wekuba .
PFX EH 0 wekugu .
PFX EH 0 wekugi .
PFX EH 0 wekuzi .
PFX EH 0 wekuki .
PFX EH 0 wekubi .
PFX EH 0 wekuli .
PFX EH 0 wekuga .
PFX EH 0 wekuka .
PFX EH 0 wekubu .
PFX EH 0 wekulu .
PFX EH 0 wekuku .
PFX EH 0 wekutu .
PFX EH 0 wetun [^lmnb]
PFX EH l wetund l.[^mn]
PFX EH l wetunn l.[mn]
PFX EH w wetump w
PFX EH 0 wetumu .
PFX EH 0 wetuba .
PFX EH 0 wetugu .
PFX EH 0 wetugi .
PFX EH 0 wetuzi .
PFX EH 0 wetuki .
PFX EH 0 wetubi .
PFX EH 0 wetuli .
PFX EH 0 wetuga .
PFX EH 0 wetuka .
PFX EH 0 wetubu .
PFX EH 0 wetulu .
PFX EH 0 wetuku .
PFX EH 0 wetutu .
