Luganda.dic
fiirako/NAgghhPSNPFFNFDPYTSCscWNwnWMWFwfWGwgWHwhWJIMiMStstSTLTNNGGRRSSMMIITTQQvvxxBGBIBSBKBFBDBHBRBPBLBNBUBEBXFYFZEHEDEJFCFDFIFJEBEFFEFSFVFMFWFTFPFNFRFGFHFAFBEKELEMwjFKFL
